California statutes. Insurance Code
(D) A loan made by a lender that does not violate Article 5.8 (commencing with Section 778) of Chapter 1 of Part 2, provided the loan is not described in paragraph (1), and is not otherwise within the definition of life settlement contract.

(E) An agreement where all of the parties satisfy one of the following conditions:

(i) They are closely related to the insured by blood or law.

(ii) They have a lawful substantial economic interest in the continued life,
 health, and bodily safety of the person insured.

(iii) They are trusts established primarily for the benefit of those parties.

(F) Any designation, consent, or agreement by an insured who is an employee of an employer in connection with the purchase by the employer, or by a trust established by the employer of life insurance on the life of the employee.

(G) A bona fide business succession planning arrangement:

(i) Between one or more shareholders in a corporation or between a corporation and one or more of its shareholders or one or more trusts established by its shareholders.

(ii) Between one or more partners in a partnership or between a partnership and one or more of its partners or one
 or more trusts established by its partners.

(iii) Between one or more members in a limited liability company or between a limited liability company and one or more of its members or one or more trusts established by its members.

(H) An agreement entered into by a service recipient, or a trust established by the service recipient, and a service provider, or a trust established by the service provider, who performs significant services for the service recipient’s trade or business.

(I) Any other contract, transaction, or arrangement from the definition of “life settlement contract” that the commissioner determines is not of the type intended to be regulated by this act.

(l) “Net death benefit” means the amount of the life insurance policy or certificate
 to be settled less any outstanding debts or liens.

(m) “Owner” means the owner of a life insurance policy or a certificate holder under a group policy, with or without a terminal illness, who enters or seeks to enter into a life settlement contract. For the purposes of this article, an owner shall not be limited to an owner of a life insurance policy or a certificate holder under a group policy that insures the life of an individual with a terminal illness or condition except where specifically addressed. The term “owner” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any provider or other licensee under this act.

(2) A qualified institutional buyer as defined in Rule 144A of the federal Securities Act of 1933, as amended.

(3) A financing entity.

(4) A special purpose entity.

(5) A related provider trust.

(n) “Patient identifying information” means an insured’s address, telephone number, facsimile number, electronic mail address, photograph or likeness, employer, employment status, social security number, or any other information that is likely to lead to the identification of the insured.

(o) “Person” means any natural person or legal entity, including, but not limited to, a partnership, limited liability company, association, trust, or corporation.

(p) “Policy” means an individual or group policy, group certificate, contract, or arrangement of life insurance owned by a resident of this state, regardless of whether delivered or
 issued for delivery in this state.

(q) “Premium finance loan” is a loan made primarily for the purpose of making premium payments on a life insurance policy, which loan is secured by an interest in such life insurance policy.

(r) “Provider” means a person, other than an owner, who enters into or effectuates a life settlement contract with an owner. A provider does not include any of the following:

(1) Any bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union.

(2) A licensed lending institution or creditor or secured party pursuant to a premium finance loan agreement which takes an assignment of a life insurance policy or certificate issued pursuant to a group life insurance policy as collateral for a loan.

(3) The insurer of a life insurance policy or rider to the extent of providing accelerated death benefits or riders or cash surrender value.

(4) A purchaser.

(5) Any authorized or eligible insurer that provides stop loss coverage to a provider, purchaser, financing entity, special purpose entity, or related provider trust.

(6) A financing entity.

(7) A related provider trust.

(8) A broker.

(9) An accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer as defined respectively in Regulation D, Rule 501 or Rule 144A of the federal Securities Act of 1933, as amended, who
 purchases a life settlement policy from a provider.

(s) “Purchaser” means a person who pays compensation or anything of value as consideration for a beneficial interest in a trust which is vested with, or for the assignment, transfer, or sale of, an ownership or other interest in a life insurance policy or a certificate issued pursuant to a group life insurance policy which has been the subject of a life settlement contract.

(t) “Related provider trust” means a titling trust or other trust established by a licensed provider or a financing entity for the sole purpose of holding the ownership or beneficial interest in purchased policies in connection with a financing transaction. In order to qualify as a related provider trust, the trust must have a written agreement with the licensed provider under which the licensed provider is responsible for ensuring compliance with all
 statutory and regulatory requirements and under which the trust agrees to make all records and files relating to life settlement transactions available to the Department of Insurance as if those records and files were maintained directly by the licensed provider.

(u) “Settled policy” means a life insurance policy or certificate that has been acquired by a provider pursuant to a life settlement contract.

(v) “Special purpose entity” means a corporation, partnership, trust, limited liability company, or other legal entity whose securities pay a fixed rate of return commensurate with established asset-backed capital markets, or has been formed solely to provide either directly or indirectly access to institutional capital markets:

(1) For a financing entity or provider.

(2) In connection with a transaction in which the securities in the special purpose entity are acquired by the owner or by a “qualified institutional buyer” as defined in Rule 144 promulgated under the federal Securities Act of 1933, as amended.

(w) “Stranger-originated life insurance” or “STOLI” is an act, practice, or arrangement to initiate the issuance of a life insurance policy in this state for the benefit of a third-party investor who, at the time of policy origination, has no insurable interest, under the laws of this state, in the life of the insured. STOLI practices include, but are not limited to, cases in which life insurance is purchased with resources or guarantees from or through a person or entity, that, at the time of policy inception, could not lawfully initiate the policy himself, herself, or itself, and where, at the time of inception, there is an arrangement or
 agreement, to directly or indirectly transfer the ownership of the policy or the policy benefits to a third party. Trusts that are created to give the appearance of insurable interest and that are used to initiate policies for investors violate insurable interest laws and the prohibition against wagering on life. STOLI arrangements do not include lawful life settlement contracts as permitted by the act that added this section or those practices set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (k), provided that they are not for the purpose of evading regulation under this act.

(x) “Terminally ill” means having an illness or sickness that can reasonably be expected to result in death in 24 months or less.

(y) “This act” shall refer to the act in the 2009–10 Regular Session that added Sections 10113.1 to 10113.35, inclusive, and as it may from time to time be
 amended.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 343, Sec. 3.   (SB 98)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.2.

(a) This section applies to any person entering into, brokering, or soliciting life settlements pursuant to this section and Sections 10113.1 and 10113.3.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) or (D), a person may not enter into, broker, or solicit life settlements pursuant to Section 10113.1 unless that person has been licensed by the commissioner under this section. The person shall file an application for a license in the form prescribed by the commissioner, and the application shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred seventy-one dollars ($171). The annual license renewal fee shall be one hundred seventy-one dollars ($171). The applicant
 shall provide any information the commissioner may require. The commissioner may issue a license, or deny the application if, in the commissioner’s discretion, it is determined that it is contrary to the interests of the public to issue a license to the applicant. The reasons for a denial shall be set forth in writing.

(A) An individual acting as a broker under this section shall complete at least 15 hours of continuing education related to life settlements and life settlement transactions, as required and approved by the commissioner, prior to operating as a broker. This requirement shall not apply to a life insurance producer who qualifies under subparagraph (D).

(B) A person licensed as an attorney, certified public accountant, or financial planner accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation
 agency, who is retained to represent the owner, and whose compensation is not paid directly or indirectly by the provider or purchaser, may negotiate a life settlement contract on behalf of the owner without having to obtain a license as a broker.

(C) A person licensed to act as a viatical settlement broker or provider as of December 31, 2009, shall be deemed qualified for licensure as a life settlement broker or provider, and shall be subject to all the provisions of this article as if the person were originally licensed as a life settlement broker or provider.

(D) (i) A life insurance producer who has been duly licensed as a life agent for at least one year or as a licensed nonresident producer in this state for one year shall be deemed to meet the licensing
 requirements of this section and shall be permitted to operate as a broker.

(ii) Not later than 10 days from the first day of operating as a broker, the life insurance producer shall notify the commissioner that the life insurance producer is acting as a broker, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and shall pay a fee of eighty-five dollars ($85).

(iii) The fee shall be paid by the life insurance producer for each license term the producer intends to operate as a broker. The fee shall be calculated pursuant to Section 1750. The notification to the commissioner shall include an acknowledgment by the life insurance producer that the life insurance producer will operate as a broker in accordance with this act.

(iv) The insurer that issued the policy that is the subject of a life settlement contract shall not be responsible for any act or omission of a broker or provider arising out of, or in connection with, the life settlement transaction, unless the insurer receives compensation for the replacement of the life settlement contract for the provider or broker.

(E) The commissioner shall review the examination for the licensing of life insurance agents and may recommend any changes to the examination to the department’s curriculum committee in order to carry out the purposes of this section and Sections 10113.1 and 10113.3.

(2) Except as provided in subparagraphs (A) and (B), whenever it appears to the commissioner that it is contrary to the interests of the public for a
 person licensed pursuant to this section to continue to transact life settlements business, the commissioner or their designee shall issue a notice to the licensee
 stating the reasons therefor. If, after a hearing, the commissioner concludes that it is contrary to the interests of the public for the licensee to continue to transact life settlements business, the commissioner may revoke the person’s license, or issue an order suspending the license for a period as determined by the commissioner. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the hearing may be conducted by administrative law judges chosen pursuant to Section 11502 or appointed by the commissioner, and the commissioner shall have the powers granted therein.

(A) The commissioner may, without hearing, suspend or revoke the license of a broker, as defined in subdivision (b) of
 Section 10113.1, if the broker has done one or more of the following:

(i) Been convicted of a felony.

(ii) Been convicted of a misdemeanor specified by this code or by other laws regulating insurance.

(iii) Had a previously issued professional, occupational, or vocational license suspended or revoked for cause by a licensing authority within the preceding five years of the commissioner’s action on grounds that would preclude the granting of a license by the commissioner under this section.

(B) A judgment, plea, or verdict of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of subparagraph (A). If the commissioner issues an
 order based on a plea that does not at any time result in a judgment of conviction, the commissioner shall vacate the order upon petition by the broker.

(3) Each licensee shall owe and pay in advance to the commissioner an annual renewal fee in an amount to be determined by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). This fee shall be for each license year, as defined by Section 1629.

(4) Any licensee that intends to discontinue transacting life settlements in this state shall so notify the commissioner, and shall surrender its license.

(c) A life settlements licensee shall file with the department a copy of all life settlement forms used in this state. A licensee may not use any life settlement
 form in this state unless it has been provided in advance to the commissioner. The commissioner may disapprove a life settlement form if, in the commissioner’s discretion, the form, or provisions contained therein, are contrary to the interests of the public, or otherwise misleading or unfair to the consumer. In the case of disapproval, the licensee may, within 15 days of notice of the disapproval, request a hearing before the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, and the hearing shall be held within 30 days of the request.

(d) Life settlements licensees shall be required to provide any applicant for a life settlement contract, at the time of application for the life settlement contract, all of the following disclosures in writing and signed by the owner, in at least 12-point type:

(1) That there are possible alternatives to life settlements, including, but not limited to, accelerated benefits options that may be offered by the life insurer.

(2) The fact that some or all of the proceeds of a life settlement may be taxable and that assistance should be sought from a professional tax adviser.

(3) Consequences for interruption of public assistance as provided by information provided by the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services under Section 11022 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) That the proceeds from a life settlement could be subject to the claims of creditors.

(5) That
 entering into a life settlement contract may cause other rights or benefits, including conversion rights and waiver of premium benefits that may exist under the policy or certificate of a group policy to be forfeited by the owner and that assistance should be sought from a professional financial adviser.

(6) That a change in ownership of the settled policy could limit the insured’s ability to purchase insurance in the future on the insured’s life because there is a limit to how much coverage insurers will issue on one life.

(7) That the owner has a right to rescind a life settlement contract within 30 days of the date it is executed by all parties and the owner has received all required disclosures, or 15 days from receipt by the owner of the proceeds of the settlement, whichever is
 sooner. Rescission, if exercised by the owner, is effective only if both notice of rescission is given and the owner repays all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest paid on account of the provider within the rescission period. If the insured dies during the rescission period, the contract shall be deemed to have been rescinded subject to repayment by the owner or the owner’s estate of all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest to the provider.

(8) That proceeds will be sent to the owner within three business days after the provider has received the insurer or group administrator’s acknowledgment that ownership of the policy or the interest in the certificate has been transferred and the beneficiary has been designated in accordance with the terms of the life settlement contract.

(9) The date by which the funds will be available to the owner and the transmitter of the funds.

(10) The disclosure document shall include the following language:
“All medical, financial, or personal information solicited or obtained by a provider or broker about an insured, including the insured’s identity or the identity of family members, a spouse, or a significant other may be disclosed as necessary to effect the life settlement contract between the owner and provider. If you are asked to provide this information, you will be asked to consent to the disclosure. The information may be provided to someone who buys the policy or provides funds for the purchase. You may be asked
 to renew your permission to share information every two years.”
(11) That the insured may be contacted by either the provider or the broker or its authorized representative for the purpose of determining the insured’s health status or to verify the insured’s address. This contact is limited to once every three months if the insured has a life expectancy of more than one year, and no more than once per month if the insured has a life expectancy of one year or less.

(12) Any affiliations or contractual relations between the provider and the broker, and the affiliation, if any, between the provider and the issuer of the policy to be settled.

(13) That a broker represents exclusively
 the owner, and not the insurer or the provider or any other person, and owes a fiduciary duty to the owner, including a duty to act according to the owner’s instructions and in the best interest of the owner.

(14) The name, business address, and telephone number of the broker.

(e) Prior to the execution of the life settlement contract by all parties, the life settlement provider entering into a life settlement contract with the owner shall provide, in a document signed by the owner, the gross purchase price the life settlement provider is paying for the policy, the amount of the purchase price to be paid to the owner, the amount of the purchase price to be paid to the owner’s life settlement broker, and the name, business address, and telephone number of the life settlement
 broker. For purposes of this section, “gross purchase price” means the total amount or value paid by the provider for the purchase of one or more life insurance policies, including commissions and fees.

(f) The broker shall provide the owner and the insured with at least all of the following disclosures in writing prior to the signing of the life settlement contract by all parties. The disclosures shall be clearly displayed in the life settlement contract or in a separate document signed by the owner:

(1) The name, business address, and telephone number of the broker.

(2) A full, complete, and accurate description of all of the offers, counteroffers, acceptances, and rejections relating to the proposed life
 settlement contract.

(3) A disclosure of any affiliations or contractual arrangements between the broker and any person making an offer in connection with the proposed life settlement contract.

(4) All estimates of the life expectancy of the insured that are obtained by the licensee in connection with the life settlement, unless that disclosure would violate any California or federal privacy laws.

(5) The commissioner may consider any failure to provide the
 disclosures or rights described in this section as a basis for suspending or revoking a broker’s or provider’s license pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(g) All medical information solicited or obtained by any person soliciting or entering into a life settlement is subject to Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, concerning confidentiality of medical information.

(h) Except as otherwise allowed or required by law, a provider, broker, insurance company, insurance producer, information bureau, rating agency, or company, or any other person with actual knowledge of an insured’s identity, shall not disclose the identity of an insured or information that there is a reasonable basis to believe that could be used to identify
 the insured or the insured’s financial or medical information to any other person unless the disclosure is one of the following:

(1) It is necessary to effect a life settlement contract between the owner and a provider and the owner and insured have provided prior written consent to the disclosure.

(2) It is necessary to effectuate the sale of life settlement contracts, or interests therein, as investments, provided the sale is conducted in accordance with applicable state and federal securities law and provided further that the owner and the insured have both provided prior written consent to the disclosure.

(3) It is provided in response to an investigation or examination by the commissioner or any other governmental
 officer or agency or any other provision of law.

(4) It is a term or condition to the transfer of a policy by one provider to another provider, in which case the receiving provider shall be required to comply with the confidentiality requirements of Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(5) It is necessary to allow the provider or broker or their authorized representatives to make contacts for the purpose of determining health status. For the purposes of this section, the term “authorized representative” shall not include any person who has or may have any financial interest in the settlement contract other than a provider, licensed broker; further, a provider or broker shall require its authorized representative to agree in writing
 to adhere to the privacy provisions of this act.

(6) It is required to purchase stop loss coverage.

(i) In addition to other questions an insurance carrier may lawfully pose to a life insurance applicant, insurance carriers may inquire in the application for insurance whether the proposed owner intends to pay premiums with the assistance of financing from a lender that will use the policy as collateral to support the financing.

(1) If the premium finance loan provides funds that can be used for a purpose other than paying for the premiums, costs, and expenses associated with obtaining and maintaining the life insurance policy and loan, the application may be rejected as a prohibited practice under this act.

(2) If the financing does not violate paragraph (1), the existence of premium financing may not be the sole criterion employed by an insurer in a decision whether to reject an application for life insurance. The insurance carrier may make disclosures to the applicant, either on the application or an amendment to the application to be completed no later than the delivery of the policy, including, but not limited to, the following:
“If you have entered into a loan arrangement where the policy is used as collateral, and the policy changes ownership at some point in the future in satisfaction of the loan, the following may be true:(A) A
 change of ownership could lead to a stranger owning an interest in the insured’s life.(B) A change of ownership could in the future limit your ability to purchase insurance on the insured’s life because there is a limit to how much coverage insurers will issue on a life.(C) You should consult a professional adviser since a change in ownership in satisfaction of the loan may result in tax consequences to the owner, depending on the structure of the loan.”
(3) In addition to the disclosures in paragraph (2), the insurance carrier may require the following certifications from the applicant or the insured:
“(A) I have not entered into any agreement or arrangement under which I have agreed to make a future sale of this life insurance policy.(B) My loan arrangement for this policy provides funds sufficient to pay for some or all of the premiums, costs, and expenses associated with obtaining and maintaining my life insurance policy, but I have not entered into any agreement by which I am to receive consideration in exchange for
 procuring this policy.(C) The borrower has an insurable interest in the insured.”
(j) Life insurers shall provide individual life insurance policyholders with a statement informing them that if they are considering making changes in the status of their policy, they should consult with a licensed insurance or financial adviser. The statement may accompany or be included in notices or mailings otherwise provided to the policyholders.

(k) The commissioner may, whenever the commissioner deems it reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the public, examine the business and affairs of any licensee or applicant for a license. The commissioner shall
 have the authority to order any licensee or applicant to produce any records, books, files, or other
 information as is reasonably necessary to ascertain whether or not the licensee or applicant is acting or has acted in violation of the law or otherwise contrary to the interests of the public. The expenses incurred in conducting any examination shall be paid by the licensee or applicant.

(l) The commissioner may investigate the conduct of any licensee, its officers, employees, agents, or any other person involved in the business of the licensee, or any applicant for a license, whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that the licensee or applicant for a license may have acted, or may be acting, in violation of the law, or otherwise contrary to the interests of the public. The commissioner may initiate an investigation on the commissioner’s own initiative, or upon a complaint filed by any other person.

(m) The commissioner may issue orders to licensees whenever the commissioner determines that it is reasonably necessary to ensure or obtain compliance with this section, or Section 10113.3. This authority includes, but is not limited to, orders directing a licensee to cease and desist in any practice that is in violation of this section, or Section 10113.3, or otherwise contrary to the interests of the public. Any licensee to which an order pursuant to this subdivision is issued may, within 15 days of receipt of that order, request a hearing at which the licensee may challenge the order.

(n) The commissioner may, after notice and a hearing at which it is determined that a licensee has violated this section or Section 10113.3 or any order issued pursuant to this section, order the licensee
 to pay a monetary penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), which may be recovered in a civil action. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the hearing may be conducted by administrative law judges chosen pursuant to Section 11502 or appointed by the commissioner, and the commissioner shall have the powers granted therein.

(o) Each licensed provider shall file with the commissioner on or before March 1 of each year an annual statement in the form prescribed by the commissioner. The information that the commissioner may require in the annual statement shall include, but not be limited to, the total number, aggregate face amount, and life settlement proceeds of policies settled during
 the immediately preceding calendar year, together with a breakdown of the information by policy issue year. The annual statement shall also include the names of the insurance companies whose policies have been settled and the brokers that have settled those policies, and that information shall be received in confidence within the meaning of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code and exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The annual statement shall not include individual transaction data regarding the business of life settlements or information that there is a reasonable basis to believe could be used to identify the owner or the insured.

(p) A person who is not a resident of California may not receive or maintain a license
 unless a written designation of an agent for service of process is filed and maintained with the commissioner. The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1600) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall apply to life settlements licensees as if they were foreign insurers, their license a certificate of authority, and the life settlements a policy, and the commissioner may modify the agreement set forth in Section 1604 accordingly.

(q) A person licensed pursuant to this section shall not engage in any false or misleading advertising, solicitation, or practice. In no case shall a broker or provider, directly or indirectly, market, advertise, solicit, or otherwise promote the purchase of a new policy for the sole purpose of or with a primary emphasis on settling the policy or use the words “free,” “no cost,” or words of similar import in the
 marketing, advertising, soliciting, or otherwise promoting of the purchase of a policy. The provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 780) and Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall apply to life settlements licensees as if they were insurers, their license a certificate of authority or producer’s license, and the life settlements a policy, and the commissioner shall liberally construe these provisions so as to protect the interests of the public.

(r) Any person who enters into a life settlement with a life settlements licensee shall have the absolute right to rescind the settlement within 30 days of the date it is executed by all parties and the owner has received all required disclosures, or 15 days from receipt by the owner of the proceeds of the settlement, whichever is sooner, and any
 waiver or settlement language contrary to this subdivision shall be void. Rescission, if exercised by the owner, is effective only if both notice of rescission is given and the owner repays all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest paid on account of the provider within the rescission period. If the insured dies during the rescission period, the contract shall be deemed to have been rescinded subject to repayment by the owner or the owner’s estate of all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest to the provider.

(s) Records of all consummated transactions and life settlement contracts shall be maintained by the provider for three years after the death of the insured and shall be available to the commissioner for inspection during reasonable business hours.

(t) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 14.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.3.

(a) A provider entering into a life settlement contract with any owner of a policy, wherein the insured is terminally ill, shall first obtain the following:

(1) If the owner is the insured, a written statement from a licensed attending physician that the owner is of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence to enter into a settlement contract.

(2) A document in which the insured consents to the release of his or her medical records to a provider, settlement broker, or insurance producer and, if the policy was issued less than two years from the date of application for a settlement contract, to the insurance company that issued the policy.

(b) The insurer shall respond to a request for verification of coverage submitted by a provider, settlement broker, or life insurance producer not later than 30 calendar days of the date the request is received. The request for verification of coverage must be made on a form approved by the commissioner. The insurer shall complete and issue the verification of coverage or indicate in which respects it is unable to respond. In its response, the insurer shall indicate whether, based on the medical evidence and documents provided, the insurer intends to pursue an investigation at this time regarding the validity of the insurance contract.

(c) Before or at the time of execution of the settlement contract, the provider shall obtain a witnessed document in which the owner consents to the settlement contract, represents that the owner has a full and complete understanding of the settlement
 contract and a full and complete understanding of the benefits of the policy, acknowledges that the owner is entering into the settlement contract freely and voluntarily, and, for persons with a terminal illness or condition, acknowledges that the insured has a terminal illness and that the terminal illness or condition was diagnosed after the policy was issued.

(d) The insurer shall not unreasonably delay effecting change of ownership or beneficiary with any life settlement contract lawfully entered into in this state or with a resident of this state.

(e) If a settlement broker or life insurance producer performs any of these activities required of the provider, the provider is deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of this section.

(f) If a broker performs those verification of coverage activities required of
 the provider, the provider is deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of this section.

(g) Within 20 days after an owner executes the life settlement contract, the provider shall give written notice to the insurer that issued that insurance policy that the policy has become subject to a life settlement contract. The notice shall be accompanied by the documents required by subdivision (d) of Section 10113.2.

(h) All medical information solicited or obtained by any licensee shall be subject to the applicable provision of state law relating to confidentiality of medical information, if not otherwise provided in this act.

(i) All life settlement contracts entered into in this state shall provide that the owner may rescind the contract on or before 30 days after the date it is executed by all parties thereto, and the
 owner has received all required disclosures, or 15 days from receipt by the owner of the full payment of the proceeds as specified below, whichever is sooner. Rescission, if exercised by the owner, is effective only if both notice of the rescission is given, and the owner repays all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest paid on account of the provider within the rescission period. If the insured dies during the rescission period, the contract shall be deemed to have been rescinded subject to repayment by the owner or the owner’s estate of all proceeds and any premiums, loans, and loan interest to the provider.

(j) Within three business days after receipt from the owner of documents to effect the transfer of the insurance policy, the provider shall pay the proceeds of the settlement to an escrow or trust account managed by a trustee or escrow agent in a state or federally chartered financial institution pending acknowledgment of
 the transfer by the issuer of the policy. The trustee or escrow agent shall be required to transfer the proceeds due to the owner within three business days of acknowledgment of the transfer from the insurer.

(k) Failure to tender the life settlement contract proceeds to the owner by the date disclosed to the owner renders the contract voidable by the owner for lack of consideration until the time the proceeds are tendered to and accepted by the owner. A failure to give written notice of the right of rescission hereunder shall toll the right of rescission until 30 days after the written notice of the right of rescission has been given.

(l) Any fee paid by a provider, party, individual, or an owner to a broker in exchange for services provided to the owner pertaining to a life settlement contract shall be computed as a percentage of the offer obtained, not the face value of the
 policy. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a broker from reducing the broker’s fee below this percentage if the broker so chooses.

(m) No person at any time prior to, or at the time of, the application for, or issuance of, a policy, or during a two-year period commencing with the date of issuance of the policy, shall enter into a life settlement regardless of the date the compensation is to be provided and regardless of the date the assignment, transfer, sale, devise, bequest, or surrender of the policy is to occur.

(1) This prohibition shall not apply if the owner certifies to the provider that the policy was issued upon the owner’s exercise of conversion rights arising out of a group or individual policy, provided the total of the time covered under the conversion policy plus the time covered under the prior policy is at least 24 months. The time covered
 under a group policy must be calculated without regard to a change in insurance carriers, provided the coverage has been continuous and under the same group sponsorship.

(2) This prohibition shall not apply if the owner submits independent evidence to the provider that one or more of the following conditions have been met within the two-year period:

(A) The owner or insured is terminally ill.

(B) The owner or insured disposes of his or her ownership interests in a closely held corporation, pursuant to the terms of a buyout or other similar agreement in effect at the time the insurance policy was initially issued.

(C) The owner’s spouse dies.

(D) The owner divorces his or her spouse.

(E) The owner retires from full-time employment.

(F) The owner becomes physically or mentally disabled and a physician determines that the disability prevents the owner from maintaining full-time employment.

(G) A final order, judgment, or decree is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, on the application of a creditor of the owner, adjudicating the owner bankrupt or insolvent, or approving a petition seeking reorganization of the owner or appointing a receiver, trustee, or liquidator to all or a substantial part of the owner’s assets.

(3) (A) Copies of the independent evidence required by paragraph (2) shall be submitted to the insurer when the provider submits a request to the insurer for verification of coverage. The copies